Utah statutes.
7-1-901.   Authorized insurance activities of depository institutions.

(1)  A depository institution authorized to do business in this state under this title may directly, or indirectly through a subsidiary or affiliate, engage in the following insurance activities:

(a)  engage in the insurance business as defined under Section 31A-1-301 except as may be limited by federal law;

(b)  act as an insurance producer or consultant as defined under Section 31A-1-301; or

(c)  engage in insurance adjusting as defined in Section 31A-26-102.

(2)  A depository institution, subsidiary, or affiliate, that engages in insurance activities authorized under Subsection (1) shall be subject to Title 31A, Insurance Code.



Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

